Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6321.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. In all respects in which the amendments to the Home Rule Charter of the
town of Hopkinton, which amendments were adopted and approved by the electors of the town of
Hopkinton on November 5, 2024, may require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment
by the general assembly, but in no other respects, the provisions of said amendments to the Home
Rule Charter of the town of Hopkinton are hereby ratified, confirmed, validated, and enacted. It is
the express intention of the general assembly, by the passage of this act, to give effect to, ratify,
confirm, validate, and enact those provisions of the said amendments to the Home Rule Charter of
the town of Hopkinton which require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment, and by
the passage of this act, the legislature does hereby ratify, confirm, validate, and enact said
provisions, but nothing in this act shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers now or
hereafter granted to cities and towns by the Home Rule amendment and other applicable laws of
the State of Rhode Island or those rights retained by said town of Hopkinton in its Home Rule
Charter.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to the town of Hopkinton
or to any person or circumstances is deemed invalid for any reason, the remainder of this act, or the
application of such provision to said town or other persons or circumstance, shall not be affected
thereby, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002872
========
LC002872 - Page 2 of 3